New Jersey, session 221, A4417.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.  Notwithstanding any other law, rule, or regulation to the contrary, at no time shall the flag of an organization designated by the United States Department of State as a terrorist organization be permitted to be displayed or flown on State property.  Any State entity occupying State property, as defined herein, upon which such a flag was permitted by such entity to be displayed or flown shall be penalized by the immediate loss of State or other funding in such amount as the Secretary of State and the Director of the Division of Budget and Accounting in the Department of the Treasury shall determine is necessary and appropriate.  All such penalties assessed for noncompliance shall be paid to the Department of the Treasury and shall be deposited in the General Fund for reallocation by the State Treasurer as may be permissible. For the purposes of this section, "State property" means land and improvements owned or leased by the State and includes, but shall not be limited to, State offices, hospitals, parks and recreational areas, institutions, and schools, including colleges and universities, together with abutting vacant land held for future use for the same purposes. This section shall not prohibit the displaying or flying of such flags for news, theatrical, historical, or educational purposes. The Secretary of State shall adopt, pursuant to the "Administrative Procedure Act," P.L.1968, c.410 (C.52:14B-1 et seq.), such rules and regulations as may be necessary to implement the provisions of this section. 2.  This act shall take effect immediately.